Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [145.904] SCHOOL-BASED TELEHEALTH PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health shall establish a school-based telehealth program. The commissioner must contract with a single telehealth provider to provide mental and physical health care to students enrolled in participating school districts. The commissioner must issue a request for proposals to select the telehealth provider. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Health care provider" has the meaning given in section 62A.673, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (c) "Health carrier" has the meaning given in section 62A.011, subdivision 2, and includes a county-based purchasing plan established under section 256B.692. new text end new text begin (d) "Minnesota health care programs" means medical assistance under chapter 256B or MinnesotaCare under chapter 256L. new text end new text begin (e) "School district" or "district" means a public school district or a charter school. new text end new text begin (f) "Telehealth" has the meaning given in section 62A.673, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (g) "Telehealth provider" means a person that makes available a technological platform for the provision of health care services through telehealth and employs the health care providers who utilize the platform. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Qualified telehealth providers. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall consider responses to the request for proposals only from applicants that: new text end new text begin (1) have experience providing health care through telehealth in educational settings, and at the time of application are providing access to health care through telehealth to at least one school district with a student population of 100,000 or more students; new text end new text begin (2) have experience in providing culturally competent pediatric health care; new text end new text begin (3) demonstrate the ability to provide high-quality physical and behavioral health services and care coordination through telehealth; new text end new text begin (4) demonstrate the ability to employ an adequate number of Minnesota-licensed health care providers to meet the market demand for services under the program; new text end new text begin (5) have a technology platform for the provision and coordination of health care services that will be made available to participating school districts; new text end new text begin (6) can bill health carriers and the Department of Human Services for provided services, including services provided to fee-for-service Minnesota health care program enrollees and to individuals enrolled in Minnesota health care program managed care plans; and new text end new text begin (7) agree to provide health care services delivered through telehealth free of charge to students who are uninsured, and to waive or reimburse students for all cost-sharing incurred for health care services received through the program. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Telehealth provider requirements. new text end new text begin The commissioner must ensure that the contract between the commissioner and the selected telehealth provider requires the telehealth provider to: new text end new text begin (1) provide health care services delivered through telehealth free of charge to students who are uninsured; new text end new text begin (2) treat as if uninsured any minor who gives effective consent to medical treatment and who would otherwise be subject to section 144.347; new text end new text begin (3) waive or reimburse students or their families for all cost-sharing incurred for health care services received through the program; new text end new text begin (4) provide the equipment, the telehealth platform, and access to the health care providers employed by the telehealth provider at no cost to the school district; and new text end new text begin (5) allow any school district to elect to participate in the program by entering into a contract with the telehealth provider. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin School district requirements. new text end new text begin (a) School districts electing to participate in the program must: new text end new text begin (1) be party to a valid contract with the selected telehealth provider; new text end new text begin (2) make health care services provided through the program available at no cost to all students enrolled in the district; and new text end new text begin (3) cooperate with the commissioner and telehealth provider to fulfill any reporting requirements under this section. new text end new text begin (b) School districts participating in the program must not use the health care services made available under this section to supplant the daily student support provided in the school by educational student service providers, including but not limited to licensed school nurses, educational psychologists, school social workers, and school counselors. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Use of funds. new text end new text begin Money appropriated for the school-based telehealth program under this section must be used only for the following purposes: new text end new text begin (1) to pay the telehealth provider an annual capitation rate of up to $22 per student enrolled in a participating school district; new text end new text begin (2) to reimburse the telehealth provider for the onetime fixed costs for establishing the school-based telehealth program in a school district; and new text end new text begin (3) to evaluate the program. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reports; evaluation. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner, in cooperation with participating school districts, shall evaluate the extent to which the program increases student access to health care services. By January 15, 2027, and every two years thereafter, the commissioner shall report the results of the evaluation to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over education finance and policy and health finance and policy. new text end new text begin (b) School districts must provide the commissioner with information the commissioner deems necessary to monitor the districts' compliance with subdivision 5, paragraph (b). The commissioner shall include in the commissioner's report to the legislature the commissioner's conclusions regarding any evidence that participating school districts are violating subdivision 5, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SCHOOL-BASED TELEHEALTH PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $20,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $20,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for the school-based telehealth program under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.904. new text end